Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2616.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 6035HV (3) 91 sb/js H.F. 2616 Section 1. Section 481A.54, Code 2026, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 2A. A person shall not shoot any rifle, 3 shotgun with a slug load, pistol, or revolver from any road. 4 For purposes of this subsection, âroadâ means the area of 5 the highway right-of-way, including the shoulders, on which 6 vehicles normally travel, and âshoulderâ means the portion 7 of a public road contiguous to the traveled way for the 8 accommodation of disabled vehicles and for emergency use. 9